Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 3 Cooperative Extension District Associations and the Rhode Island Agricultural Council

2-3-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agriculture council” means an organization composed of groups engaged in supporting and promoting the interests of agriculture within this state and providing educational and informative material to its citizens.

“Cooperative extension” means a partnership made up of residents, the Land Grant College (the University of Rhode Island), the state of Rhode Island, the U.S. Department of Agriculture, and city and town governments. The purpose of this partnership is
to plan, finance, and operate extension programs transmitting practical information including, but not limited to, agriculture, home economics, natural and community resources, and 4-H youth development produced by research centers
and universities to the public.

“District association” means a county or district organization established to undertake the purposes of cooperative extension and to cooperate with the Land Grant College (the University of Rhode Island), the U.S. Department of Agriculture, and the state,
in employing extension agents and in carrying on cooperative extension work.

“Extension agents” means a person or persons qualified by training and experience to instruct in the science and art of agriculture, home economics, natural and community resources, and 4-H youth development who devote their time to demonstrations and
other forms of educational instruction.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-2.
Cooperative extension district associations.

There shall be three (3) cooperative extension district associations: (1) The southern Rhode Island cooperative extension service comprising Washington and Kent counties; (2) The eastern Rhode Island cooperative extension service comprising Newport and
Bristol counties; and (3) The northern Rhode Island cooperative extension service comprising Providence county.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-3.
Organizational requirements for participation.

The cooperative extension district associations are incorporated under the laws of Rhode Island; are governed by boards of directors selected to represent as evenly as possible all parts of their respective districts; and shall maintain and abide by the
memorandum of agreement with the director of cooperative extension at the University of Rhode Island.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-4.
Receipts and disbursement of funds for cooperative extension work.

The district associations organized under this chapter are authorized to receive funds from the United States Department of Agriculture, the state, the cities and towns of the state, and from individuals, organizations, corporations, and other funding
sources that may desire to contribute to the educational work contemplated by this chapter. The district associations are authorized to disburse the funds received in employing extension agents, defraying their expenses, and providing
support personnel, office facilities, and materials for demonstrations and other forms of education and instruction according to plans and methods approved by the United States Department of Agriculture for carrying out the provisions
of the federal Smith-Lever Act, 7 U.S.C. § 341 et seq., and any subsequent act providing for extension work and by the University of Rhode Island.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-5.
Annual report of activities.

It is the duty of each district association to present annually to the secretary of state a full report of its activities for the preceding year including a statement of its receipts from all sources and disbursements.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-6.
Raising of local funds — Amount of state contributions — Local matching funds.

Each district association shall raise funds for the purposes provided in this chapter. Each city or town within its respective district is authorized to appropriate and turn over to the treasurer of the association serving that district any sums that
the city or town may approve.

For the purpose of paying the state’s share of the annual expenses of the cooperative educational work provided for in §§

2-3-1

—

2-3-6

, the general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it deems necessary. Any district association not raising within the district covered by the district association, exclusive of funds received from any
agency of the United States, an amount equal to the sum appropriated by the state for use by that district association shall draw from the state appropriation during the fiscal year only a sum equal to the amount raised by that
district association, exclusive of funds received from any agency of the United States, and expended during the fiscal year as shown by a certificate filed in the office of the state controller, sworn to by the president and treasurer
of the district association. The state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of any sums authorized upon the presentation of the certificates and vouchers signed respectively
by the president and treasurer of the district association.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-7.
Cooperation in 4-H youth development activities.

The director of cooperative extension at the Land Grant College (the University of Rhode Island) is authorized to provide support in cooperation with the district associations for annual 4-H activities and events, including fairs, demonstrating the work
of 4-H members, and for contests, competitions, premiums and awards, and when deemed essential, for representation by carefully chosen Rhode Island 4-H members at 4-H conferences or exhibitions throughout the United States.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-8.
Appropriations for 4-H youth development activities.

The sum of four thousand five hundred dollars ($4,500) is annually appropriated, out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, to be expended by the respective officers of the three (3) district associations:

Fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) to the eastern Rhode Island cooperative extension service for expenses in connection with its annual 4-H fair and/or other 4-H activities;

Fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) to the northern Rhode Island cooperative extension service for expenses in connection with its annual 4-H fair and/or other 4-H activities; and

Fifteen hundred dollars ($1,500) to the southern Rhode Island cooperative extension service for expenses in connection with its annual 4-H fair and/or other 4-H activities;

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of this money, or so much as may be required from time to time, upon the receipt by the state controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-9.
Annual appropriation to the Rhode Island agricultural council.

The sum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) is annually appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated to the Rhode Island agricultural council to support its efforts to improve the agricultural economy of Rhode Island. The state
controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of this money, or so much as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by the state controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.

2-3-10.
Appropriations for general education purposes.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum that it may deem necessary for the purpose of supporting the program of the department of environmental management in its enlargement of cooperation with agricultural organizations as exemplified
by the Rhode Island agricultural council in the endeavor to promote, encourage, generally better rural living in Rhode Island; to encourage and promote agriculture in this state and improve the state’s agricultural interests; to hold
meetings throughout the state with discussions conducted by authorities from both within and without the state; to make awards for outstanding agricultural contributions, and to assist Rhode Island agriculturalists in every way to
overcome the problems that confront them in the agricultural field. This sum is to be expended under the direction of the director of the department of environmental management with a committee of five (5) members of the Rhode Island
agricultural council appointed annually by the president of the council within thirty (30) days after the annual meeting of the council. The committee is to act in an advisory capacity and to assist in the formulation of plans and
programs.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 512, art. 2, § 35.

2-3-11.
Annual report by the Rhode Island agricultural council.

The Rhode Island agricultural council shall make an annual report to the director of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.
P.L. 1988, ch. 553, § 2.